Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1210.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Cryptocurrency Reporting Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Blockchain." A distributed ledger technology in which the data:(1) is shared across a network that creates a digital ledger of verified transactions or information among network participants; and1234567891011121314151617 (2) is typically linked using cryptography to maintain the integrity of the ledger and execute other functions, including transfer of ownership or value."Consensus mechanism." A process to achieve agreement among network participants on the current state of a blockchain."Crypto-asset mining." The process of performing computations to add a valid block of data to a blockchain, typically in exchange for a reward or fee using a proof of work consensus mechanism and excluding computations required to validate individual transactions."Department." The Department of Environmental Protection of the Commonwealth."Environmental justice area." A geographic area that is identified or designated by the department and characterized by increased pollution burden and vulnerable populations based on demographic, economic, health and environmental data."Power load." The amount of electrical power, in megawatts, that is consumed by a qualifying crypto-asset mining operation."Qualifying crypto-asset mining operation." A crypto-asset mining operation located in this Commonwealth at:(1) one location that has a power load greater than or equal to five megawatts;(2) more than one location that has a cumulative power load that is greater than or equal to five megawatts; or(3) a natural gas well site.Section 3. Reporting requirements for qualifying crypto-asset mining operations.(a) Initial reporting.--No later than six months after the effective date of this subsection, the owner of a qualifying crypto-asset mining operation shall submit the following 20250HB1210PN1358 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 information to the department on a form prescribed by the department:(1) The number and geographic locations of the qualifying crypto-asset mining operation.(2) The number and type of devices engaged in crypto-asset mining purchased and retired by the qualifying crypto-asset mining operation in the past year.(3) The amount of electric energy consumed by the qualifying crypto-asset mining operation, including the time of electricity usage.(4) The source or sources of electric generation for all electric energy consumed by the qualifying crypto-asset mining operation, including the type of fuel used by the electric generating facility.(5) Any other information deemed necessary by the department.(b) Ongoing reporting.--Prior to starting operations in this Commonwealth and annually while operations continue, a qualifying crypto-asset mining operation shall submit the information required under subsection (a) to the department.(c) Form and publication of operation.--The department shall prepare a form that includes all of the information required under subsections (a) and (b) and shall post the information submitted to the department under this section on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.Section 4. Impact study by department.(a) Duty to issue.--No later than one year after the effective date of this subsection, the department, in consultation with the Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission, shall conduct a study of and issue a report on all of the 20250HB1210PN1358 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 following:(1) The number and location of any existing or planned qualifying crypto-asset mining operations, including any operations located in an environmental justice area.(2) The anticipated increase of new, and expansion of existing, qualifying crypto-asset mining operations.(3) The potential impacts of electric energy consumption by qualifying crypto-asset mining operations, including by prolonging the use of fossil fuel generators.(4) The ecological impacts, including ecological impacts associated with electronic waste generation and the use or discharge of cooling water, caused by qualifying crypto-asset mining operations.(5) The amount of electric energy consumed by each qualifying crypto-asset mining operation, including the time of use of electricity and the potential grid stress posed by the power load of the qualifying crypto-asset mining operation.(6) The source of electric energy consumed by each qualifying crypto-asset mining operation.(7) An analysis of demand-response programs negotiated between qualifying crypto-asset mining operations and electric utilities.(8) An analysis of potential rate-design measures that could be implemented by State and local regulators to reduce the energy consumption and dependence on fossil fuel energy sources of qualifying crypto-asset mining operations.(b) Report submission.--The department shall submit the report required under subsection (a) to the following no later than one year after the effective date of this subsection:20250HB1210PN1358 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The Governor.(2) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Environmental Resources and Energy Committee of the Senate.(3) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Environmental and Natural Resource Protection Committee of the House of Representatives.(4) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Energy Committee of the House of Representatives.(c) Publication.--The department shall publish the report required under subsection (a) on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.Section 5. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1210PN1358 - 5 - 12345678910111213